District of Columbia statutes.
31-3171.18

Applicability.

(a)

This chapter shall apply through September 30, 2014.

(b)

Beginning on October 1, 2014, this chapter shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.

Mar. 2, 2012, D.C. Law 19-94, § 19, 59 DCR 213
Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 7015, 59 DCR 8025
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 rewrote the section.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 7015 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 7015 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).
Section 7016 of D.C. Law 19-168 provided that § 7015 of the act shall apply as of June 19, 2012.